test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-1-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kika-wîcihin	# you will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kika-wîcihik	# he/she will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kika-wîcihinân	# you will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kika-wîcihikonaw	# he/she will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kika-wîcihikowâw	# he/she will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kika-wîcihâwak	# you will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimâwa	# you will help another/others
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimîw	# he/she will help yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kika-wîcihitinân	# we will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nika-wîcihânân	# we will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kika-wîcihitinân	# we will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nika-wîcihânânak	# we will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nika-wîcihimânâna	# we will help another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kika-wîcihânaw	# we and you will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kika-wîcihânawak	# we and you will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimânawa	# we and you will help another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kika-wîcihinâwâw	# you all will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kika-wîcihâwâw	# you all will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kika-wîcihinân	# you all will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kika-wîcihâwâwak	# you all will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimâwâwa	# you all will help another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: [nika-wîcihikowak, nika-wîcihikwak]	# they will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: [kika-wîcihikowak, kika-wîcihikwak]	# they will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nika-wîcihikonânak	# they will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kika-wîcihikonawak	# they will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kika-wîcihikowâwak	# they will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihîwak	# they will help another/others
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimîwak	# they will help yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-wîcihikothiwa	# another/others will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-wîcihikothiwa	# another/others will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ka-wîcihikow, ka-wîcihik]	# another/others will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-wîcihikonâna	# another/others will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-wîcihikonawa	# another/others will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-wîcihikowâwa	# another/others will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ka-wîcihikowak, ka-wîcihikwak]	# another/others will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihîthiwa	# another/others will help yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihikothiwa	# yet another/others will help another/others

      # X
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nika-wîcihikawin	# someone will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kika-wîcihikawin	# someone will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: ka-wîcihâw	# someone will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nika-wîcihikawinân	# someone will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kika-wîcihikawinaw, kika-wîcihikawinânaw]	# someone will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kika-wîcihikawinâwâw	# someone will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: ka-wîcihâwak	# someone will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihâthiwa	# someone will help another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Inf # PV/ka

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ka-wîcihitân	# I will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ka-wîcihak	# I will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ka-wîcihitakok	# I will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ka-wîcihakik	# I will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimak	# I will help another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-wîcihithan	# you will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ka-wîcihat	# you will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-wîcihithâhk	# you will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-wîcihacik	# you will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimat	# you will help another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-wîcihithan	# you will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ka-wîcihisk	# he/she will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-wîcihithâhk	# you will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ka-wîcihikothahk	# he/she will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ka-wîcihikothîk	# he/she will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-wîcihacik	# you will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimat	# you will help another/others
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimât	# he/she will help yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ka-wîcihitâhk	# we will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihâthâhk	# we will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ka-wîcihitâhk	# we will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihâthâhkik	# we will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâthâhk	# we will help another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihâthahk	# we and you will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihâthahkok	# we and you will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâthahk	# we and you will help another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ka-wîcihithîk	# you all will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihâthîk	# you all will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ka-wîcihithâhk	# you all will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihâthîkok	# you all will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâthîk	# you all will help another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: ka-wîcihicik	# they will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ka-wîcihiskik	# they will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ka-wîcihikothâhkik	# they will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ka-wîcihikothahkok	# they will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ka-wîcihikothîkok	# they will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihâcik	# they will help another/others
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâcik	# they will help yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ka-wîcihimit	# another/others will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ka-wîcihimisk	# another/others will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihikot	# another/others will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ka-wîcihikothâhk	# another/others will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ka-wîcihikothahk	# another/others will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ka-wîcihikothîk	# another/others will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihikocik	# another/others will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihâthit	# another/others will help yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihikothit	# yet another/others will help another/others

      # X
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: ka-wîcihikawithân	# someone will help me
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: ka-wîcihikawithan	# someone will help you
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: ka-wîcihiht	# someone will help him/her
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: ka-wîcihikawithâhk	# someone will help us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: ka-wîcihikawithahk	# someone will help you and us
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: ka-wîcihikawithîk	# someone will help you all
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: ka-wîcihihcik	# someone will help them
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimiht	# someone will help another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Inf # PV/ta

      # 1Sg
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ta-wîcihitân	# I help you
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ta-wîcihak	# I help him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ta-wîcihitakok	# I help you all
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ta-wîcihakik	# I help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimak	# I help another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-wîcihithan	# you help me
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ta-wîcihat	# you help him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-wîcihithâhk	# you help us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-wîcihacik	# you help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimat	# you help another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-wîcihithan	# you help me
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ta-wîcihisk	# he/she helps you
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-wîcihithâhk	# you help us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ta-wîcihikothahk	# he/she helps you and us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ta-wîcihikothîk	# he/she helps you all
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-wîcihacik	# you help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimat	# you help another/others
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimât	# he/she helps yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ta-wîcihitâhk	# we help you
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihâthâhk	# we help him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ta-wîcihitâhk	# we help you all
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihâthâhkik	# we help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâthâhk	# we help another/others
